Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.080

Fee schedule to be kept posted.

Every county officer entitled to collect fees from the public shall keep posted in his or her office a plain and legible statement of the fees allowed by law and failure so to do shall subject the officer to a fine of one hundred dollars and costs, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4018; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.080. Prior: 1890 p 315 s 41; RRS s 4223. Cf. Code 1881 s 2091; 1869 p 373 s 13.]